Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Education, in conjunction with the Commission on Indian
Services, shall study the Tribal Attendance Promising Practices grant program.  Specifically,
the commission and the department shall study opportunities to expand the program  in-
cluding increases in funding to enable the program  to serve more students at existing pro-
gram locations, and  increases in funding to facilitate the establishment of additional program
locations throughout  this state. The commission and the department shall submit a report
in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation,
to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to education no later than
September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
Passed by House April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3218 (HB 3218-A) Page 1